Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2234
Care management clients; voluntary contributions; client family income schedule; care management unit; reimbursement.

(1) Care management clients may contribute to the costs of receiving care management services, as provided under section 81-2230. A client family income schedule, using the federal poverty guidelines, shall be used to determine a care management client's voluntary contribution. Individuals who have family income below three hundred percent of a poverty level determined by the Department of Health and Human Services based on any federal poverty index or similar guidelines may contribute from zero to ninety percent of the cost for the services provided by a care management unit. The client family income schedule shall be adopted and promulgated as rules and regulations by the department and shall reflect the income range of individuals.

(2) A care management unit may receive reimbursement from state and federal government programs which allow for reimbursement for care management or case management services.

Laws 1987, LB 42, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 880;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 30.
July 18, 2026